Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 15 Public Transit Program

§ 24-15-101.
Public transit program created; duties.

There is created a “public transit program” to be administered by the Wyoming department of transportation. The department shall:

Accept public transit funds from the federal transit administration on behalf of the state;

Adopt rules and regulations to implement the purposes of this chapter;

Distribute state and federal public transit funds to eligible grantees pursuant to federal requirements and rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 164, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 24-15-102.
Public transit account.

There is created a public transit account within the highway fund. The department shall fund the program annually with one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) using unrestricted state highway funds. Funds provided to the state under the federal Transit Act and other funds that may become available to assist urban and rural public transit programs shall be in addition to funding provided from unrestricted highway funds. Funds in the account shall be distributed and expended in accordance with federal requirements and department rules and regulations.

Recipients of funds under the federal Transit Act may transfer unused grant funds for the benefit of other public transit programs in the state, subject to the following:

Any transfer of funds under this paragraph shall require the approval of the governor;

Transferred federal funds under this paragraph shall be reimbursed to the transferor by the department from unrestricted state highway funds to be used as local match for federal funds at the rate of one dollar ($1.00) for every three dollars ($3.00) of federal funds transferred by the transferor;

To the extent not reimbursed from unrestricted state funds, the federal funds transferred shall be used for the benefit of public transit program grantees for the acquisition of new transit vehicles, replacement of transit vehicles or rehabilitation of vehicles in the transit fleet;

Federal funds transferred by a program grantee may be carried over into the following fiscal year by the department or a recipient public transit program grantee.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 164, § 1; 1999, ch. 144, § 1.

Federal Transit Act. —

The Federal Transit Act, referred to in this section, appears as 49 U.S.C. § 5301 et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 150, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates 1,000,000 from the general fund to the department of transportation to be deposited in a separate account within the public transit account created by §

24-15-102

. The funds and any interest earned under this separate account are to be distributed to eligible grantees under the public transit program created by §

24-15-101

, pursuant to rules promulgated by the department, which specify that funds within the separate account are to be used only for operational expenses and not for capital improvements. To the extent funds, including interest earned on the funds, are available, the department of transportation may distribute funds from the separate account within the public transit account to eligible grantees. The funds distributed by the department from the separate account are in addition to any funds distributed under §

24-15-102

. The appropriation under the act is to be considered a one-time appropriation, and is not to be considered a part of the division's standard budget during the department of administration and information's budget preparation cycle in the 2007-2008 biennium budget.

Laws 2009, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, provides:

“(a) There is appropriated one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) from the general fund to the department of transportation. The funds appropriated under this act shall be deposited in a separate account within the public transit account created by W.S.

24-15-102

.

“(b) The funds appropriated under this act and any interest earned therefrom shall be distributed to eligible grantees under the public transit program created by W.S.

24-15-101

, pursuant to rules promulgated by the department of transportation. The department of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations specifying that funds within the separate account shall be used only for operational expenses and bus purchases.

“(c) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009, not more than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) may be distributed from the separate account created by this act.

“(d) The funds distributed by the department of transportation from the separate account created by this act shall be in addition to any funds distributed under W.S.

24-15-102

and shall not be considered funds distributed under W.S.

24-15-102

.

“(e) The appropriation made under this act shall be a one (1) time appropriation and shall not be considered part of the department of transportation's standard 2011-2012 biennium budget.

“(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the appropriation made under this act shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”